Utah statutes.
70A-7a-401.   Irregularities in issue of receipt or bill or conduct of
issuer.
The obligations imposed by this chapter on an issuer apply to a document of
title even if:
(1)  the document does not comply with the requirements of this chapter or of
any other statute, rule, or regulation regarding its issuance, form, or
content;
(2)  the issuer violated laws regulating the conduct of its business;
(3)  the goods covered by the document were owned by the bailee when the
document was issued; or
(4)  the person issuing the document is not a warehouse but the document
purports to be a warehouse receipt.
